Utah statutes.
13-14b-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Audit" means a review by a supplier of a dealer's warranty claims records.

(2)  "Current net price" means the price charged to a dealer for repair parts as listed in the printed price list or catalog or invoice of the supplier in effect at the time a warranty claim is submitted.

(3)  "Dealer agreement" means an oral or written contract or an agreement of definite or indefinite duration, between a supplier and an equipment dealer that authorizes or requires the equipment dealer to perform services or supply parts under a warranty, or to do both.

(4)  "Equipment dealer" or "dealer" means a person or any other entity having a dealer agreement for selling and retailing:

(a)  agricultural equipment;

(b)  dairy and farmstead mechanization equipment;

(c)  construction, utility, and industrial equipment;

(d)  outdoor power equipment;

(e)  lawn and garden equipment; or

(f)  attachments or repair parts for equipment listed in Subsections (4)(a) through (e).

(5) (a)  "Supplier" means a person or any other entity engaged in the manufacturing, assembly, or wholesale distribution of an item listed in Subsections (4)(a) through (f).

(b)  "Supplier" includes:

(i)  any successor in interest, including a purchaser of assets or stock; and

(ii)  a surviving corporation resulting from a merger, liquidation, or reorganization of the original supplier that issued the warranty.

(6)  "Warranty claim" means a claim for payment submitted by an equipment dealer to a supplier for service or parts, or both, provided to a customer under a:

(a)  warranty issued by the supplier; or

(b)  recall or modification order issued by the supplier.

